Mississippi statutes. Title 45. Public Safety and Good Order
Chapter 37. Prevention of Youth Access to Tobacco Act

§§ 45-37-1 and 45-37-3.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1997, ch. 578, § 15, eff from and after February 1, 1998.

§45-37-1. [Laws, 1994, ch. 486, § 1]

§45-37-3. [Laws, 1994, ch. 486, § 2]

§ 45-37-5.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2002, ch. 314, § 1, approved March 14, 2002.

[Laws, 1994, ch. 486, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1994.]

§ 45-37-7.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1997, ch. 578, § 15, eff from and after February 1, 1998.

[Laws, 1994, ch. 486, § 4]